District of Columbia statutes.
38-158

Detail of officers to training program.

Pursuant to section 101(1)(c) and (d) of the Reserve Officers’ Training Corps Vitalization Act of 1964, approved October 13, 1964 (78 Stat. 1063; 10 U.S.C. § 2031(c) and (d)), the Board of Education, beginning in the 1995-96 School Year, shall request and ensure that active duty officers and noncommissioned officers of the U.S. Armed Forces be detailed as administrators and instructors to the District of Columbia Public Schools’ Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps program.

March 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1204, 43 DCR 5
1981 Ed., § 31-122.
For temporary addition of section, see § 1405 of the Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-137, August 14, 1995, 42 DCR 4706) § 1405 of the Budget Support Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-154, November 9, 1995, 42 DCR 6569), and § 1204 of the Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-206, February 9, 1996, 43 DCR 777).